Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) As used in this section, “the plan of assistance” means the plan of as-
sistance established by the Public Utility Commission under section 6, chapter 290,  Oregon
Laws 1987.
(2) The Oregon Telephone  Assistance Program Advisory Committee is established as an
advisory committee to the commission for  the purposes described in subsection (4) of this
section.
(3) The committee consists of the following nine members appointed by the Governor:
(a) A person who represents the Public Utility  Commission who is knowledgeable about
telecommunications;
(b) A person who represents the Citizens’ Utility Board;
(c) A person who represents the Oregon Health Authority;
(d) A person  who represents telecommunications carriers, including cellular phone car-
riers;
(e) A person who represents coordinated care organizations, as defined in ORS 414.025;
(f) A person who represents individuals who are homeless;
(g) A person who represents individuals who are deaf, deaf-blind or hard of hearing;
(h) A person who is a  low income customer who receives assistance under section 6,
chapter 290, Oregon Laws 1987; and
(i) A resident of this state with a background in marketing and outreach.
(4) The committee shall:
(a) Establish goals for participation by low income customers in the plan of assistance;
(b) Advise the commission on the eligibility process for participating  in the plan of as-
sistance;
(c) Advise the commission on the regulation of the plan of assistance, including:
(A) Advice on streamlining eligibility processes;
(B) Advice on improving handset activations;
(C) Advice on use of Social Security numbers and other identifying documents; and
(D) Advice  on use of a comprehensive human services outreach approach to encourage
participation in the plan of assistance;
Enrolled House Bill 3268 (HB 3268-B) Page 1
(d) Review the participation rates in programs offered by  other states that are similar
to the plan  of assistance, particularly programs that have a higher participation rate than
the plan of assistance;
(e) Develop a strategic plan to increase the participation rate in the plan of assistance;
(f) Annually review the participation rate in the plan of assistance and any annual  in-
crease in the participation rate in the plan of assistance; and
(g) Make recommendations as to the use of available funds for the following activities:
(A) Marketing and outreach;
(B) Developing partnerships with low income constituency groups; and
(C) Coordinating with state agencies that serve the low income customers  eligible to
participate in the plan of assistance.
(5) A majority of the members of the committee constitutes a quorum for the trans-
action of business.
(6) Official action by the  committee requires the approval of a majority of the members
of the committee.
(7) The committee shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(8) The term of office of each member of  the committee is four years, but a member
serves at the pleasure of the Governor. Before the expiration of the  term of a member, the
Governor shall appoint a successor whose term begins on January  1 of the following year.
A member is eligible for reappointment. If there is a vacancy for any cause, the Governor
shall make an appointment to become immediately effective for the unexpired term.
(9) The committee shall meet at times  and places specified by the call of the chairperson
or of a majority of the members of the committee.
(10) The committee shall adopt rules necessary for the operation of the committee.
(11) Members of the  committee are not entitled to compensation, but may be reimbursed
for actual and necessary travel and  other expenses incurred by them in the performance of
their official duties in  the manner and amounts provided for in ORS 292.495. Claims for ex-
penses shall  be paid out of funds appropriated to the commission for purposes of the com-
mittee.
(12) The commission shall provide staff support and perform other services for the com-
mittee as is necessary for the effective operation of the committee.
SECTION 2.
(1) From moneys collected as a  surcharge under section 7, chapter 290,
Oregon Laws 1987, the  Public Utility Commission shall expend moneys on marketing and
outreach activities as is necessary to increase the  participation rate in the plan of assistance
established by the commission under section 6, chapter 290, Oregon Laws 1987.
(2) The Oregon  Telephone Assistance Program Advisory Committee established under
section 1 of this 2017 Act will annually review use of moneys collected as a surcharge under
section 7, chapter 290, Oregon Laws 1987, and make recommendations to the commission  on
the amount of moneys to expend on marketing and outreach activities.
(3) Notwithstanding subsections (1) and (2) of  this section, moneys expended on market-
ing and outreach activities under this section may not exceed 15 percent of moneys collected
as a surcharge under section 7, chapter 290, Oregon Laws 1987.
(4) A coordinated care  organization, as defined in ORS 414.025, may not directly receive
moneys expended under this section.
SECTION 3.
 Section 7, chapter  290, Oregon Laws 1987, as amended by section 2, chapter 622,
Oregon Laws 1991, section 8, chapter 872, Oregon Laws  1991, section 1, chapter 231, Oregon Laws
1993, section 387, chapter 79, Oregon Laws 1995, section 1, chapter 451, Oregon Laws 1995,  section
2, chapter 408, Oregon Laws 2001, and section 1, chapter 78, Oregon Laws 2011, is  amended to read:
Sec. 7.  (1) In order to fund the [ programs provided in sections 2 to 6 and ] program described
in sections  9 to 14, chapter 290, Oregon  Laws 1987, the Public Utility Commission shall develop
and implement a system for assessing a surcharge in an amount not to exceed 35 cents per month
against each paying retail subscriber who has telecommunications service  with access to the tele-
Enrolled House Bill 3268 (HB 3268-B) Page 2
communications relay service.  The surcharge shall be applied on a telecommunications circuit des-
ignated for a particular subscriber. One subscriber  line shall be counted for each circuit that is
capable of generating usage on the line side of the switched network regardless of the quantity of
customer premises equipment  connected to each circuit. For providers of central office based ser-
vices, the surcharge shall be applied to each line that has unrestricted  connection to the telecom-
munications relay service. These central office based service lines that have  restricted access to the
telecommunications relay service  shall be charged based on software design. For cellular, wireless
or other radio common carriers, the surcharge  shall be applied on a per instrument basis, but ap-
plies only to subscribers  whose place of primary use, as defined and determined under 4 U.S.C. 116
to 126, is within this state.
(2) The surcharge imposed by subsection (1) of this section does not apply to:
(a) Services upon which the  state is prohibited from imposing the surcharge by the Constitution
or laws of the United States or the Constitution or laws of the State of Oregon.
(b) Interconnection between  telecommunications utilities, telecommunications cooperatives,
competitive telecommunications services providers certified  pursuant to ORS 759.020, radio common
carriers and interexchange carriers.
(3) The commission  annually shall review the surcharge and the balance in the Residential
Service Protection Fund and may make adjustments  to the amount of the surcharge to ensure that
the fund has  adequate resources but that the fund balance does not exceed six months of projected
expenses.
(4) Moneys  collected pursuant to the surcharge shall not be considered in any proceeding to
establish rates for telecommunication service.
(5) The commission shall direct telecommunications public utilities to identify separately in  bills
to customers for service the surcharge imposed pursuant to this section.
(6) Notwithstanding  ORS 314.835 and 314.840, the Department of Revenue may disclose infor-
mation received under ORS 403.200 to 403.230 to the Public Utility Commission to carry out the
provisions of sections 9 to 14,  chapter 290, Oregon Laws 1987.
(7) The Public  Utility Commission may disclose information obtained pursuant to sections 9 to
14, chapter 290, Oregon Laws 1987, to the Department of  Revenue to administer the tax imposed
under ORS 403.200 to 403.230.
SECTION 4.
 Section 16, chapter 290, Oregon Laws 1987, as amended  by section 4, chapter 622,
Oregon Laws 1991, section 1, chapter 481, Oregon Laws  1997, section 1, chapter 408, Oregon Laws
2001, and section 1, chapter 544, Oregon Laws 2009, is amended to read:
Sec. 16.  [ Chapter 290, Oregon Laws 1987, is repealed January 1, 2020. ]
(1)(a) Sections 1, 2, 3, 4,  5 and 15, chapter 290, Oregon Laws 1987, are repealed on January
1, 2023.
(b) Section 6,  chapter 290, Oregon Laws 1987, as amended by section 1, chapter 622,
Oregon Laws 1991, section 1, chapter 29, Oregon Laws 2007, section 25, chapter 599,  Oregon
Laws 2009, section 1, chapter 77, Oregon  Laws 2011, and section 1, chapter 29, Oregon Laws
2013, is repealed on January 1, 2023.
(c) Section 2, chapter 204, Oregon Laws 2005, as amended by section  359, chapter 70,
Oregon Laws 2007, is repealed on January 1, 2023.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, if the participation rate in  the plan of
assistance established by the  Public Utility Commission under section 6, chapter 290, Oregon
Laws 1987, increases to at least 26 percent between January 1, 2018, and January 1, 2023:
(a) Sections 1, 2, 3, 4, 5 and 15, chapter 290, Oregon  Laws 1987, are repealed on January
1, 2030.
(b) Section 6,  chapter 290, Oregon Laws 1987, as amended by section 1, chapter 622,
Oregon Laws 1991, section 1, chapter 29, Oregon Laws 2007, section 25, chapter 599,  Oregon
Laws 2009, section 1, chapter 77, Oregon  Laws 2011, and section 1, chapter 29, Oregon Laws
2013, is repealed on January 1, 2030.
Enrolled House Bill 3268 (HB 3268-B) Page 3
(c) Section 2, chapter 204, Oregon Laws 2005, as amended by section  359, chapter 70,
Oregon Laws 2007, is repealed on January 1, 2030.
SECTION 5. On or before September 30, 2022, the Public Utility Commission shall report
to the interim committees of the Legislative  Assembly related to health and business the
following:
(1) The average annual participation rate in the plan  of assistance established by the
commission under section  6, chapter 290, Oregon Laws 1987, for 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021
and 2022;
(2) The annual moneys expended on marketing and outreach activities under section 2
of this 2017 Act during 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021 and 2022;
(3) A  description of marketing and outreach activities funded under section 2 of this 2017
Act and  an assessment of the quantitative or qualitative impact of those marketing and
outreach activities; and
(4) The amount of benefits  provided through the plan of assistance established by the
commission under section  6, chapter 290, Oregon Laws 1987, for 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021
and 2022.
SECTION 6. (1) The amendments to section 7, chapter 290,  Oregon Laws 1987, by section
3 of this 2017 Act become operative on January 2, 2023.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, if the participation rate in  the plan of
assistance established by the  Public Utility Commission under section 6, chapter 290, Oregon
Laws 1987, increases to at  least 26 percent between January 1, 2018, and January 1, 2023, the
amendments to  section 7, chapter 290, Oregon Laws 1987, by section 3 of this 2017 Act be-
come operative on January 2, 2030.
Passed by House April 27, 2017
Repassed by House June 14, 2017
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 12, 2017
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3268 (HB 3268-B) Page 4